Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202015-210
Parks, monuments, recreation centers; acquire; construct; maintain; donations.

A city of the primary class shall have the power to (1) acquire, hold, and improve public grounds, parks, playgrounds, swimming pools, recreation centers, or any other park or recreational use or facility within or without the limits of the city, (2) provide for the protection and preservation and use of such grounds, parks, and other uses and facilities, (3) provide for the planting and protection of trees, (4) erect and construct or aid in the erection and construction of statues, memorials, works of art, and other structures upon any public grounds of the city or state or political subdivision thereof, and (5) receive grants, devises, donations, and bequests of money or property for the purposes described in this section, in trust or otherwise.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 129, XI, p. 129;

Laws 1911, c. 11, § 2, p. 91;

R.S.1913, § 4423;

C.S.1922, § 3807;

C.S.1929, § 15-210;

R.S.1943, § 15-210;

Laws 1959, c. 41, § 1, p. 222;

Laws 1967, c. 55, § 1, p. 190;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 29.
November 14, 2020